District of Columbia statutes.
7-3007

Residency and insurance requirements.

In addition to other eligibility requirements established pursuant to this chapter, a prospective client shall be a District resident and not have insurance benefits available for substance abuse treatment. A client shall continue to be a resident while participating in the Program.

History

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-146, § 8, 47 DCR 4350